Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.030

Secretary of health.

The executive head and appointing authority of the department shall be the secretary of health. The secretary shall be appointed by, and serve at the pleasure of, the governor in accordance with RCW 43.17.020. The secretary shall be paid a salary to be fixed by the governor in accordance with RCW 43.03.040.

[ 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 104.]